th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับทารกและเด็กเล็ก > เก้าอี้เด็กและเก้าอี้หัดทานข้าว: เบาะรองนั่งเก้าอี้ทานข้าวเด็ก; ที่พักเท้าและปลอกหุ้มขาเก้าอี้ทานข้าวเด็ก; สายรัดนิรภัยสำหรับเก้าอี้ทานข้าวเด็ก; ถาดเก้าอี้ทานข้าวเด็ก
ko: 가구 > 영유아 가구 > 유아용 식탁 의자/보조 의자 부대용품: 하이체어 쿠션; 하이체어 발받침 및 레그 랩; 하이체어 하네스 및 안전 스트랩; 하이체어 트레이
da: Møbler > Møbler til baby og småbørn > Høje stole og børnesæder – tilbehør: Hynder til højstole; Fodstøtter og benbeskyttere til højstole; Seler og sikkerhedsremme til højstole; Bordplader til højstole
vi: Đồ gỗ > Đồ nội thất cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ > Phụ kiện ghế ngồi ăn và ghế nâng cho trẻ em: Đệm lót ghế ăn dặm; Chỗ để chân & đai bọc chân ghế ăn dặm; Đai an toàn cho ghế ăn dặm; Khay để thức ăn ghế ăn dặm
cs: Nábytek > Nábytek pro děti a kojence > Dětské židle a sedačky – příslušenství: Polstrování do jídelních židliček; Opěrky nohou a obaly na nohy jídelních židliček; Popruhy a bezpečnostní pásy k jídelním židličkám; Pultíky k jídelním židličkám
pt-BR: Móveis > Móveis para bebês > Acessórios para cadeiras de refeição: Almofadas para cadeira de alimentação; Apoios para pés e pernas para cadeira de alimentação; Cintos e alças de segurança para cadeira de alimentação; Bandejas para cadeira de alimentação
tr: Mobilyalar > Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilyaları > Mama Sandalyesi ve Koltuk Yükseltici Aksesuarları: Mama sandalyesi minderleri; Mama sandalyesi ayak destekleri ve bacak kılıfları; Mama sandalyesi emniyet kemerleri; Mama sandalyesi tepsileri
es: Mobiliario > Mobiliario para bebés y niños pequeños > Accesorios para tronas y alzadores: Cojines para sillas altas; Reposapiés y fundas para patas de sillas altas; Arneses y correas de seguridad para sillas altas; Bandejas para sillas altas
sk-SK: Nábytok > Detský nábytok > Príslušenstvo pre vysoké stoličky a podsedáky: Vankúše na detskú stoličku; Opierky na nohy pre detské stoličky; Popruhy a bezpečnostné pásy pre detské stoličky; Podnosy na detské stoličky
fi: Huonekalut > Vauvojen ja leikki-ikäisten huonekalut > Syöttötuolien ja istuinkorokkeiden lisätarvikkeet: Syöttötuolien pehmusteet; Syöttötuolien jalkatuet ja pehmusteet; Syöttötuolien valjaat ja turvahihnat; Syöttötuolien tarjottimet
fr: Meubles > Mobilier pour bébés et tout-petits > Accessoires pour chaises hautes et réhausseurs: Coussins pour chaises hautes; Repose-pieds et enveloppes de pieds pour chaises hautes; Harnais et sangles de sécurité pour chaises hautes; Tablettes pour chaises hautes
hu: Bútor > Baba- és csecsemőbútorok > Etetőszék- és ülésmagasító-kiegészítők: Etetőszék-párnák; Etetőszék-lábtartók és lábvédők; Etetőszék-hámok és -biztonsági övek; Etetőszék-tálcák
pl: Meble > Meble dla dzieci i niemowląt > Akcesoria do wysokich krzeseł i fotelików samochodowych: Poduszki do krzesełek do karmienia; Podnóżki i owijki na nogi do krzesełek do karmienia; Szelki i paski bezpieczeństwa do krzesełek do karmienia; Tacki do krzesełek do karmienia
bg-BG: Мебели > Мебели за бебета и малки деца > Аксесоари за високи столчета и бустерни седалки: Възглавници за столче за хранене; Подложки за крака и обвивки за столчета за хранене; Колани и предпазни презрамки за столчета за хранене; Табли за столче за хранене
el: Έπιπλα > Βρεφικά & παιδικά έπιπλα > Αξεσουάρ καρεκλών φαγητού & ενισχυτικών καθισμάτων: Μαξιλάρια για καρεκλάκια φαγητού; Υποπόδια και προστατευτικά ποδιών για καρεκλάκια φαγητού; Ζώνες και ιμάντες ασφαλείας για καρεκλάκια φαγητού; Δίσκοι για καρεκλάκια φαγητού
lt-LT: Baldai > Baldai kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams > Aukštų kėdučių ir sėdynių pagalvėlių priedai: Maitinimo kėdučių pagalvėlės; Maitinimo kėdučių kojų atramos ir įtvarai; Maitinimo kėdučių diržai ir saugos dirželiai; Maitinimo kėdučių padėklai
zh-TW: 家具 > 嬰幼兒家具 > 高腳椅/輔助餐椅配件: 兒童餐椅軟墊; 兒童餐椅腳踏板與腿部護套; 兒童餐椅安全帶與固定帶; 兒童餐椅托盤
ru: Мебель > Мебель для детей и младенцев > Аксессуары для высоких стульчиков и сидений-бустеров: Подушки для стульчиков для кормления; Подножки и чехлы на ножки для стульчиков; Ремни безопасности для стульчиков для кормления; Столики для стульчиков для кормления
zh-CN: 家具 > 婴幼儿家具 > 儿童餐椅与汽车座椅配件: 高脚椅垫; 高脚椅脚踏和腿套; 高脚椅安全带和绑带; 高脚椅托盘
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Mobiliário de bebé e criança > Acessórios para bancos elevatórios e cadeiras de refeição: Almofadas para cadeiras da papa; Apoios de pés e proteções de pernas para cadeiras da papa; Arneses e correias de segurança para cadeiras da papa; Tabuleiros para cadeiras da papa
it: Arredamento > Mobili per bebè e bimbi > Accessori per seggioloni e rialzi per sedie: Cuscini per seggioloni; Poggiapiedi e fasce per seggioloni; Imbracature e cinghie di sicurezza per seggioloni; Vassoi per seggioloni
ja: 家具 > ベビー用家具 > ハイチェア・ベビーチェア用品: ハイチェアクッション; ハイチェアフットレスト・レッグラップ; ハイチェアハーネス・安全ストラップ; ハイチェアトレイ
sv: Möbler > Möbler för bebisar och småbarn > Tillbehör till barnstolar och sittdynor: Stolsdynor till barnmatstolar; Fotstöd & benskydd till barnmatstolar; Selar & säkerhetsremmar till barnmatstolar; Brickor till barnmatstolar
en: Furniture > Baby & Toddler Furniture > High Chair & Booster Seat Accessories: High Chair Cushions; High Chair Footrests & Leg Wraps; High Chair Harnesses & Safety Straps; High Chair Trays
de: Möbel > Baby- & Kleinkindmöbel > Zubehör für Hochstühle und Sitzerhöhungen: Hochstuhlkissen; Hochstuhl-Fußstützen & -Beinschoner; Hochstuhl-Halte- & Sicherheitsgurte; Hochstuhltabletts
nb: Møbler > Møbler for baby og barn > Tilbehør til barnestoler og barneseter: Puter til høystol; Fotstøtter og benbeskyttere til høystol; Seler og sikkerhetsstropper til høystol; Bord til høystol
ro-RO: Mobilier > Mobilier pentru bebeluși și copii mici > Accesorii pentru scaune înalte și scaune de ridicare: Perne pentru scaun de masă; Suporturi pentru picioare și învelitori pentru scaun de masă; Hamuri și curele de siguranță pentru scaun de masă; Tăvițe pentru scaun de masă
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Pohištvo za dojenčke in malčke > Dodatki za stolčke za hranjenje in blazine za stolček: Blazine za otroški stolček; Nasloni za noge in oporniki za noge za otroške stolčke; Varnostni pasovi in jermeni za otroški stolček; Pladnji za otroške stolčke
nl: Meubelen > Meubelen voor baby's en peuters > Accessoires voor kinderstoelen en stoelverhogers: Kinderstoelkussens; Kinderstoelvoetensteunen en -pootwraps; Kinderstoeltuigjes en -veiligheidsriemen; Kinderstoelbladen
hr-HR: Namještaj > Namještaj za bebe i malu djecu > Dodaci za hranilice i pomoćne sjedalice: Jastuci za hranilicu; Oslonci za noge i omoti za noge za hranilicu; Pojasevi i sigurnosni remeni za hranilicu; Poslužavnici za hranilicu